test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-pool_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - põõʹl e-stem pöly: # Noun - full paradigm
     põõʹl+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: põõʹl
     põõʹl+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: põõʹl
     põõʹl+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: põõʹl
     põõʹl+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: põõʹle
     põõʹl+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: põõʹlest
     põõʹl+N+Sg+Com+Indef: põõʹlin
     põõʹl+N+Ess+Indef: põõʹlen
     põõʹl+N+Par+Indef: põõʹled
     põõʹl+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [põõʹltaa, põõʹltää]
     põõʹl+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: põõʹl
     põõʹl+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: põõʹli
     põõʹl+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: põõʹlid
     põõʹl+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: põõʹlid
     põõʹl+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: põõʹlin
     põõʹl+N+Pl+Com+Indef: põõʹlivuiʹm
     põõʹl+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [põõʹlitaa, põõʹlitää]
